Hawaii, session 2026, SB2321.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the two-lined spittlebug (Prosapia bicincta) is an invasive insect that attacks key forage grasses used by the livestock ranching industry.  In 2016, the State's first two-lined spittlebug infestation was discovered in Kailua-Kona on the island of Hawaii, where the pest damaged nearly two thousand acres of pastureland.  Grasses damaged by two-lined spittlebug infestations are often unsalvageable and must be replanted. The legislature further finds that two-lined spittlebug infestations have reduced the quality of forage pastures in Hawaii by reducing their nutritional value, palatability, and productivity.  Infestations of the pest also promote the establishment of weeds and lower-quality foraging grasses. The legislature additionally finds that livestock ranching is a highly productive and extremely valuable industry on all of the State's major islands.  In 2023, the State's livestock industry had a production value of more than $50,000,000, with an inventory of over 143,000 head of beef cattle.  Collectively, ranchlands cover almost twenty per cent of the State's land area. The legislature concludes that the expanding livestock industry serves as an economic engine for the State and is a major employer for local communities.  This is particularly true on the island of Hawaii, where most of the State's cattle are raised.  Additionally, seventy per cent of all beef cattle in Hawaii are raised on sod-forming grasses, such as kikuyu and pangola.  Consequently, two-lined spittlebugs threaten jobs and food security in the State, making it crucial to address infestation and restrict further spread. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish a two-year two‑lined spittlebug response pilot program to mitigate and control the spread of the two-lined spittlebug. SECTION 2. (a)  There is established within the department of agriculture and biosecurity a two-year two-lined spittlebug response pilot program.  The pilot program shall: (1)  Identify new areas of two-lined spittlebug infestation, determine population density, and develop a management plan for the infested area; (2)  Apply the use of insecticides, grazing, and other methods for weed management and reseeding pastures; (3)  Conduct a cost-benefit study of two-lined spittlebug mitigation techniques; (4)  Conduct outreach to state and county departments to reduce the movement of two-lined spittlebugs through heavy machinery; (5)  As necessary, take measures to reduce the population of two-lined spittlebugs and assist in recovery efforts; and (6)  Provide support for livestock ranchers' mitigation efforts, including reimbursement for approved two-lined spittlebug control measures, as determined by the department of agriculture and biosecurity. (b) The department of agriculture and biosecurity shall submit a report to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular sessions of 2027 and 2028.  The report shall: (1)  Document the expenditure of funds appropriated by this Act; (2)  Discuss the progress of activities to mitigate and control infestations of the two-lined spittlebug; and (3)  Provide any findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation. (c) The pilot program shall cease to exist on June 30, 2028. SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment and operation of the two-lined spittlebug response pilot program. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of agriculture and biosecurity for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.